Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-410
Electronic signature and online notary seal; use; registered device; report of theft or vandalism.

(1) An online notary public's electronic signature in combination with the online notary seal shall be used only for the purpose of performing online notarial acts.

(2) An online notary public shall take reasonable steps to ensure that any registered device used to create an electronic signature is current and has not been revoked or terminated by the device's issuing or registering authority.

(3) An online notary public shall keep secure and under his or her exclusive control: The online notary public's electronic signature, online notary seal, and the electronic record and backup record required under section 64-409. The online notary public shall not allow another person to use the online notary public's electronic signature, online notary seal, or electronic record or backup record.

(4) An online notary public shall immediately notify an appropriate law enforcement agency and the Secretary of State of the theft or vandalism of the online notary public's electronic signature, online notary seal, or the electronic record or backup record required under section 64-409. An online notary public shall immediately notify the Secretary of State of the loss or use by another person of the online notary public's electronic signature, online notary seal, or the electronic record or backup record required under section 64-409.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 10.